Hawaii, session 2026, SB2398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 54, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§54-     Service availability for residential dwellings.  (a)  The board of water supply shall publish on its website maps of its service areas that: (1)  Reflect the availability of domestic water service for new residential dwelling construction or expansions of existing residential dwellings proposed for at least one to four housing units per parcel in residentially zoned areas; (2)  Include general descriptions regarding any limitations to the availability of domestic water service as a result of source, storage, or distribution deficiency; provided that: (A)  Parcel-by-parcel information shall not be required; (B)  Utility assets shall not need to be specified; and (C)  Geographically identified areas shall be consistent with the detail in general plan maps developed under section 46-4; and (3)  Include sufficient supporting analysis explaining the deficiency or other limitation in paragraph (2) that disallows a service connection. (b)  The maps shall be published on the website of the board of water supply no later than January 1, 2029, and updated no less than annually thereafter. (c)  The board of water supply may add a disclaimer stating that the map data is preliminary and is not the actual permit determination on water availability. (d)  For parcel owners where maps identify water availability, the board of water supply shall create a process on its website to request a conditional clearance based on maps confirming that water is available for a parcel.  Any clearance positively confirming water service shall be honored if a building permit is submitted by the parcel owner within at least ninety days of board determination. (e)  The board of water supply may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this section." SECTION 2.  Chapter 54, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§54-     Service availability for residential dwellings.  (a)  The board of water supply shall publish on its website maps of its service areas that: (1)  Reflect the availability of domestic water service for new residential dwelling construction or expansions of existing residential dwellings proposed for at least one to four housing units per parcel in residentially zoned areas; (2)  Include general descriptions regarding any limitations to the availability of domestic water service as a result of source, storage, or distribution deficiency; provided that: (A)  Parcel-by-parcel information shall not be required; (B)  Utility assets shall not need to be specified; and (C)  Geographically identified areas shall be consistent with the detail in general plan maps developed under section 46-4; and (3)  Include sufficient supporting analysis explaining the deficiency or other limitation in paragraph (2) that disallows a service connection. (b)  The maps shall be published on the website of the board of water supply no later than January 1, 2029, and updated no less than annually thereafter. (c)  The board of water supply may add a disclaimer stating that the map data is preliminary and is not the actual permit determination on water availability. (d)  For parcel owners where maps identify water availability, the board of water supply shall create a process on its website to request a conditional clearance based on maps confirming that water is available for a parcel.  Any clearance positively confirming water service shall be honored if a building permit is submitted by the parcel owner within at least ninety days of board determination. (e)  The board of water supply may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this section." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.